src/fst/phonology.twolc
!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/046 <==
!! ============================================================================
"U>и in Imperatives with double-consonant stems, щ stems, and single-consonant stems with prefix вы́-"
%^U:и <=>                                      :C (:ь) [ :C - :й ] (%^M:0) %<: _ ( т е ) ( с [ я: | ь ] ) .#. ;
                                                                :щ (%^M:0) %<: _ ( т е ) ( с [ я: | ь ] ) .#. ; !TODO native S this true?
          .#. VyPrefix [ Letter | %^F:0 ]* :V [ :C - [ :г | :й ] ] (%^M:0) %<: _ ( т е ) ( с [ я: | ь ] ) .#. ; ! TODO fix ~вы́сить, etc. perhaps by explicitly marking the prefix вы́- with an archiphoneme %^Y? This could also be used in stress rules and remove -a continuation classes that are only for вы́-prefixed verbs.
          .#. VyPrefix [ Letter | %^F:0 ]* [ :V - [ :я́ | :я ] ] :г (%^M:0) %<: _ ( т е ) ( с [ я: | ь ] ) .#. ;
                ! по́мн<U   мо́рщ<U  вы́бег<U
                ! по́мн_и   мо́рщ_и  бы́бег_и

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/047 <==
!! ============================================================================
"U>ь in Imperatives with consonant stem (exceptions in previous rule)"
%^U:ь <=> .#. [ ?* - [ VyPrefix ?* ]] :V [ :C - [ :щ | :г | :й ] ] (%^M:0) %<: _ ( т е ) ( с [ я: | ь ] ) .#. ;
                ! отве́т<U
                ! отве́т_ь

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/048 <==
!! ============================================================================
"U>0 in Imperatives with velar stem, i.e. лечь"
%^U:0 <=>                                             [:я́ | :я] :г (%^M:0) %<: _ ( т е ) ( с [ я: | ь ] ) .#. ; ! only applies to ~лечь
                                                                         й %<: _ ( т е ) ( с [ я: | ь ] ) .#. ;
	! повы́бFей<U    ля́г<U
	! повы́б_ей__	ля́г__

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/049 <==
!! ============================================================================
"я>ь (i.e. ся>сь) in singular reflexive imperatives"
я:ь <=> %<: [ :и | :и́ ] с: _ .#. ;
